California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(f) This chapter shall not be used to effectuate placement in jails or correctional treatment centers, as defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (j) of Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 85, Sec. 68.   (AB 135)   Effective July 16, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

15701.25.

“Endangered adult” means a dependent or elder adult who is at immediate risk of serious injury or death, due to suspected abuse or neglect and who demonstrates the inability to take action to protect himself or herself from the consequences of remaining in that situation or condition.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 913, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

15701.4.

“Appropriate temporary protective services” means those services provided to ensure that the endangered adult is protected from the immediate risk of serious injury or death due to suspected abuse or neglect, and that the effects of the abuse or neglect are remedied in accordance with the endangered adult’s needs. These services may include, but not be limited to, any of the following:

(a) Social services case work and case management, including, but not limited to, evaluations of the endangered adult’s functional capacity and community resources.

(b) The development of an appropriate individualized service plan.

(c) Appropriate referral and emergency response services.

(d) Counseling.

(e) Temporary shelter.

(f) Emergency services.

(g) Respite services.

(h) Alternative housing and housing assistance.

(i) In-home supportive services.

(j) Adaptive equipment.

(k) Transportation.

(l) Psychology services.

(m) Other health related services and referrals to legal services and advocate agencies.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 913, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Protective Services [15703. - 15705.40.]

15703.

(a) When, from personal observation, an authorized state or local law enforcement officer or designated employee of a county department of social services or mental health determines that an adult is an endangered adult, and no other option is available to mitigate the circumstances of that adult, the person may take the endangered adult into temporary emergency protective custody, and initiate adult protective proceedings.

(b) When an authorized person takes an endangered adult into temporary emergency protective custody and initiates adult protective proceedings, the person shall cause the endangered adult to be transported to a hospital as soon as possible if medical evaluation and any necessary treatment is required.

(c) Upon taking an endangered adult into custody pursuant to this chapter, the law enforcement agency taking the endangered adult into custody shall notify:

(1) The superior court.

(2) The endangered person’s next of kin, when appropriate.

(3) Adult protective services.

(d) This article shall not apply to state-licensed facilities.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 913, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

15703.05.

Whether or not medical treatment is required, a physician treating an adult may, if he or she determines that the person is an endangered adult, delay the release of the endangered adult until a local law enforcement agency takes custody of the endangered adult, it is determined by the responding agency the adult is not endangered, or the responding agency takes other appropriate action to ensure the safety of the endangered adult.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 913, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

15703.1.

(a) Temporary emergency protective custody under this chapter shall not exceed a period commencing at the time the endangered adult has been taken into protective custody to the first court day commencing not more than 72 hours thereafter.

(b) Upon being taken into temporary emergency custody, the endangered adult shall be transferred to an appropriate temporary residence, pending the outcome of investigation and judicial hearing required by this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 913, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

15705.

(a) A designated county agency shall initiate an investigation and file a petition for issuance of an emergency protective services order within 24 hours after the endangered adult has been taken into temporary emergency protective custody.

(b) (1) The court shall hold a preliminary hearing no later than the first court day commencing after a period of 48 hours after the endangered adult has been taken into temporary emergency custody to establish probable cause for grounds for protective custody.

(2) The court shall render its decision on the petition no later than the first court day following a period of 72 hours after the endangered adult has been taken into protective custody.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 913, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

15705.05.

If, as a result of the preliminary hearing, the court determines that probable cause does not exist to continue temporary emergency protective custody, the adult shall be released from temporary protective custody.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 913, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

15705.1.

If, as a result of the preliminary hearing, the court determines that probable cause continues to exist for temporary emergency protective custody, the court may issue an order authorizing the provision of protective services on an emergency basis to an adult after finding on the record, based on clear and convincing evidence, that all of the following apply:

(a) The adult is an endangered adult.

(b) No other appropriate means are available to mitigate the situation that placed the endangered adult at risk of serious bodily harm or death.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 913, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

15705.15.

In issuing an emergency order under this article, the court shall adhere to all of the following limitations:

(a) Only those protective services that are necessary to remove the conditions creating the emergency shall be ordered, and the court shall specifically designate the approved services in the emergency order.

(b) Protective services authorized by an emergency order shall not include hospitalization or a change of residence unless the court specifically finds that action is necessary and gives specific approval for that action in its order.

(c) Protective services may be provided through an emergency order for no more than 14 days, exclusive of Saturdays, Sundays, and legal holidays pending a hearing for long-term custody.

(d) (1) In its emergency order under this article, the court shall appoint the petitioner, next of kin, or other interested person, as appropriate, as a temporary conservator of the endangered adult.

(2) The court’s appointee shall be responsible for the care of the endangered adult.

(3) The court’s appointee may, until the expiration of the court’s order, give consent for the provision of protective services for the endangered adult, in accordance with the emergency order.

(e) The issuance of an emergency order and the appointment of a temporary conservator of the endangered adult shall not deprive that endangered adult of any rights except to the extent provided in the order of appointment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 913, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

15705.2.

A petition for an emergency order under this article shall set forth all of the following information:

(a) The name, address, and interest of the petitioner.

(b) The name, age, and address of the person in need of protective service.

(c) The proposed protective services.

(d) The petitioner’s reasonable belief, together with facts supportive thereof, of the existence of those circumstances that warrant the issuance of an emergency order.

(e) A statement of the petitioner’s attempts to obtain the consent of the person for whom the protective services are proposed, and the outcome of those attempts.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 913, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

15705.25.

(a) Notice of the filing of a petition for an emergency order shall be given, in language as understandable by the endangered adult as reasonably possible, at least 24 hours prior to the hearing on the petition for emergency intervention.

(b) The court may waive the 24-hour notice requirement on a showing that immediate and reasonably foreseeable physical harm to the person or other persons will result from the 24-hour delay, and reasonable attempts have been made to give notice. Notice of the final order of the court shall be given to each of the parties to the petition hearing.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 913, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

15705.30.

The hearing on a petition for an emergency order under this article shall be held under all of the following conditions:

(a) The person with respect to whom an emergency order is sought shall be present unless that person knowingly and voluntarily waives the right to be present or due to the person’s physical or psychological condition, he or she is unable to be present. Waiver or inability to be present shall not be presumed from that nonappearance of the endangered adult, but shall be determined on the basis of factual information supplied to the court by counsel or a representative appointed by the court.

(b) The endangered adult has the right to counsel, regardless of whether he or she is present at the hearing. If the person is indigent or lacks the capacity to waive counsel, the court shall appoint counsel. The attorney shall advise the endangered adult of his or her rights in relation to the proceeding and shall represent him or her before the court.

(c) The endangered adult or his or her representative may present evidence and cross-examine witnesses.

(d) The hearing shall be held no earlier than 24 hours after the notice of the hearing has been given, unless the notice has been waived by the court.

(e) The court shall issue, for the record, a statement of its findings in support of any order for emergency protective services.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 913, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

15705.35.

Before any law enforcement agency may implement this article, including the taking of any person into protective custody pursuant to Section 15703, the law enforcement agency shall enter into a signed agreement with the county adult protective services agency that specifies the protocol that the county and the law enforcement agency shall follow in implementing this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 913, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

15705.37.

This chapter shall be operative in a county only if the county board of supervisors has adopted a resolution to make this chapter operative in that county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 913, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

15705.40.

This article shall not be used to circumvent the involuntary commitment process provided for pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 5150) of Part 1 of Division 5.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 913, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 13. Adult Protective Services [15750. - 15768.]

15750.

(a) The definitions contained in Chapter 11 (commencing with Section 15600) shall govern the construction of this chapter.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), and for the purposes of investigating or providing services under an adult protective services program pursuant to this chapter, the following definitions apply:

(1) (A) “Dependent adult” means any person residing in this state between 18 and 59 years of age, inclusive, who resides in this state, and who has a combination of a disability and the inability to protect their own interest, or who has an inability to carry out normal activities to protect their rights, including, but not limited to, persons who have physical or developmental disabilities, or whose physical or mental abilities have diminished because of age.

(B) “Dependent adult” includes any person between 18 and 59 years of age, inclusive, who is admitted as an inpatient to a 24-hour facility, as defined in Sections 1250, 1250.2, and 1250.3 of the Health and Safety Code.

(2) “Elder” means any person residing in this state 60 years of age or older. 

(c) Subdivision (b) shall be operative on January 1, 2022.

(d) To the extent that this section has an overall effect of increasing the costs already borne by a local agency for programs or levels of service mandated by the 2011 Realignment Legislation within the meaning of Section 36 of Article XIII of the California Constitution, it shall apply to local agencies only to the extent that the state provides annual funding for the cost increase. Any program costs that may be incurred by a local agency pursuant to this section that is above the level of funding which has been appropriated in the annual Budget Act shall not require a
 subvention of funds by the state or otherwise be subject to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 85, Sec. 69.   (AB 135)   Effective July 16, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

15751.

Each county welfare department shall establish and support a system of protective services to elderly and dependent adults who may be subjected to neglect, abuse, or exploitation, or who are unable to protect their own interest.

This system shall be known as the county adult protective services system.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 15750 by Stats. 2002, Ch. 54, Sec. 18.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

15752.

Each county shall establish and maintain a specialized entity within the county welfare department which shall have lead responsibility for the operation of the adult protective services program.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 15751 by Stats. 2002, Ch. 54, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

15753.

The department shall, to the extent funding for this purpose remains with the department, establish one full-time position that reports to the director to assist counties with the following functions in their operation of the adult protective services system:

(a) Facilitating the review and update of state policies and procedures to promote best casework practices throughout the state, and providing technical assistance to local programs to promote consistent statewide adherence to these policies.

(b) Developing recommended program goals, performance measures, and outcomes for the adult protective services system, and a strategic plan to accomplish these
 recommended goals, performance measures, and outcomes.

(c) Collaborating with other state departments and local communities that provide or oversee elder justice services to address the needs of elders and adults with disabilities and improve coordination and effectiveness of adult protective services.

(d) Exploring the development of a state data collection system that builds on existing statewide data and additionally tracks outcomes that will align with national data collection efforts.

(e) Participating in national, statewide, and regional discussions on adult protective services and elder justice issues and providing information on California’s adult protective services programs.

(f) Participating in the development of federal and state policy
 that responds to new and emergent needs and develops suggested quality assurance measures to be implemented at the local level.

(g) Facilitating the development of a regionally based, ongoing, comprehensive and consistent statewide adult protective services training program that responds to new and emerging trends.

(h) In collaboration with experts in the field, developing guidelines for local adult protective services programs that will make recommendations for local practice in following areas:

(1) Caseload levels for adult protective services workers.

(2) Availability of tangible services for local programs.

(3) Educational and professional development of adult protective services
 workers.

(4) Structure for 24 hour adult protective services response.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 20, Sec. 29.   (SB 79)   Effective June 24, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

15754.

(a) Notwithstanding any provision of law governing the disclosure of information and records, persons who are trained and qualified to serve on multidisciplinary personnel teams may disclose to one another information and records which are relevant to the prevention, identification, or treatment of abuse of elderly or dependent persons.

(b) Except as provided in subdivision (a), any personnel of the multidisciplinary team that receives information pursuant to this chapter, shall be under the same obligations and subject to the same confidentiality penalties as the person disclosing or providing that information. The information obtained shall be maintained in a manner that ensures the maximum protection of privacy and confidentiality rights.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1166, Sec. 7.   Effective September 26, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

15755.

A law enforcement agency may seek a search warrant from a magistrate pursuant to the procedures set forth in Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 1523) of Title 12 of Part 2 of the Penal Code to enable a peace officer to have access to, and to inspect, premises if a county welfare worker has been denied access to the premises by the person or persons in possession of the premises and there is probable cause to believe an elder or dependent adult on those premises is subject to abuse. While executing the search warrant the peace officer may allow a county welfare worker, or any other appropriate person, to accompany him or her.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1246, Sec. 17.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

15760.

Adult protective services shall include investigations, needs assessments, remedial and preventive social work activities; the necessary tangible resources such as food, transportation, emergency shelter, and in-home protective care; the use of multidisciplinary teams; and a system in which reporting of abuse can occur on a 24-hour basis.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 54, Sec. 25.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

15762.

When an allegation of abuse of an elder or dependent adult is reported to a county designated adult protective service agency and an agency social worker has reason to believe an elder or dependent adult has suffered or is at substantial risk of abuse pursuant to Section 15630, the social worker shall attempt to obtain consent to enter and meet privately with the elder or dependent adult about whom the report was made in the residence or dwelling in which the elder or dependent adult resides without the presence of the person’s caretaker, attendant, or family or household member, unless the person requests the presence of the attendant, care giver, or family member, or refuses to meet with the social worker.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 946, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 1999.   Section operative May 1, 1999, pursuant to Section 15765.)
-------------------------------------------

15763.

(a) Each county shall establish an emergency response adult protective services program that shall provide in-person response, 24 hours per day, seven days per week, to reports of abuse of an elder or a dependent adult, for the purpose of providing immediate intake or intervention, or both, to new reports involving immediate life threats and to crises in existing cases. The program shall include policies and procedures to accomplish all of the following:

(1) Provision of case management services that include investigation of the protection issues, assessment of the person’s concerns, needs, strengths, problems, and limitations, stabilization and linking with community services, and development of a service plan to alleviate identified problems utilizing
 counseling, monitoring, followup, and reassessment.

(2) Provisions for emergency shelter or in-home protection to guarantee a safe place for the elder or dependent adult to stay until the dangers at home can be resolved.

(3) Establishment of multidisciplinary teams to develop interagency treatment strategies, to ensure maximum coordination with existing community resources, to ensure maximum access on behalf of elders and dependent adults, and to avoid duplication of efforts. The multidisciplinary team may include community-based agencies, health plans, and other state- and county-based service providers.

(4) Provisions for
 homeless prevention through the Home Safe Program established in Chapter 14 (commencing with Section 15770), to the extent that funding is provided for this purpose in the annual Budget Act and the county receives those funds.

(b) (1) A county shall respond immediately to any report of imminent danger to an elder or dependent adult in other than a long-term care facility, as defined in Section 9701, or a residential facility, as defined in Section 1502 of the Health and Safety Code. For reports involving persons in a long-term care facility or a residential care facility, the county shall report to the local long-term care ombudsman program. Adult protective services
 staff shall consult, coordinate, and support efforts of the ombudsman program to protect vulnerable residents. Except as specified in paragraph (2), the county shall respond to all other reports of danger to an elder or dependent adult in other than a long-term care facility or residential care facility within 10 calendar days or as soon as practicably possible.

(2) An immediate or 10-day in-person response is not required when the county, based upon an evaluation of risk, determines and documents that the elder or dependent adult is not in imminent danger and that an immediate or 10-day in-person response is not necessary to protect the health or safety of the elder or dependent adult.

(3) The State Department of Social Services, in consultation with the County Welfare Directors
 Association of California, shall develop requirements for implementation of paragraph (2), including, but not limited to, guidelines for determining appropriate application of this section and any applicable documentation requirements.

(4) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department shall implement the requirements developed pursuant to paragraph (3) by means of all-county letters or similar instructions before adopting regulations for that purpose. Thereafter, the department shall adopt regulations in accordance with the requirements of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2
 of the Government Code.

(c) A county shall not be required to report or respond to a report pursuant to subdivision (b) that involves danger to an elder or dependent adult residing in any facility for the incarceration of prisoners that is operated by or under contract to the Federal Bureau of Prisons, the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, a county sheriff’s department, a county probation department, a city police department, or any other law enforcement agency when the abuse reportedly has occurred in that facility.

(d) A county shall provide case management services to elders and dependent adults who are determined to be in need of adult protective services for the purpose of bringing about changes in the lives of victims and to provide a safety net to enable victims to protect themselves in the future. Case management services shall include
 all of the following, to the extent services are appropriate for the individual:

(1) Investigation of the protection issues, including, but not limited to, social, medical, environmental, physical, emotional, and developmental.

(2) Assessment of the person’s concerns and needs on whom the report has been made and the concerns and needs of other members of the family and household.

(3) Analysis of problems and strengths.

(4) Establishment of a service plan for each person on whom the report has been made to alleviate the identified problems.

(5) Client input and acceptance of proposed service plans.

(6) Counseling for clients and significant others to alleviate the identified problems and to implement the service plan.

(7) Stabilizing and linking with community
 services, including, but not limited to, those provided by health plans, other county-based service providers, and community agencies.

(8) Monitoring and followup.

(9) Reassessments, as appropriate.

(e) (1) To the extent resources are available, each county shall provide emergency shelter in the form of a safe haven or in-home protection for victims. Shelter and care appropriate to the needs of the victim shall be provided for frail and disabled victims who are in need of assistance with activities of daily living.

(2) To the extent a county receives grant funds under the Home Safe Program (Chapter 14 (commencing with Section 15770)), counties may provide housing assistance and support to elders and dependent adults who are homeless or at risk of becoming homeless.

(f) Each county shall designate an adult protective services agency to establish and maintain multidisciplinary teams including, but not limited to, adult protective services, law enforcement, probation departments, home health care agencies, hospitals, adult protective services staff, the public guardian, private community service agencies, public health agencies, and mental health agencies for the purpose of providing interagency treatment strategies.

(g) Each county shall provide tangible support services, to the extent resources are available, which may include, but not be limited to,
 emergency food, clothing, repair or replacement of essential appliances, plumbing and electrical repair, blankets, linens, and other household goods, advocacy with utility companies, and emergency response units.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 85, Sec. 70.   (AB 135)   Effective July 16, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

15764.

Notwithstanding Section 10101.1, a county shall have no share of any nonfederal expenditures above the required expenditures for this program in the 1996–97 fiscal year, provided that the county has maintained the level of county matching funds it provided for this program in the 1996–97 fiscal year.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 946, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 1999.   Section operative May 1, 1999, pursuant to Section 15765.)
-------------------------------------------

15765.

This chapter shall become operative on May 1, 1999. Commencing with the 1999–2000 fiscal year, Sections 15760 to 15764, inclusive, shall be implemented only to the extent funds are provided in the annual Budget Act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 54, Sec. 28.   Effective January 1, 2003.   Note: This section makes implementation of Sections 15760 to 15764 contingent upon Budget Act funding.)
-------------------------------------------

15766.

The investigation of allegations of elder and dependent adult abuse pursuant to this chapter, and the case management of elder and dependent adult abuse cases shall be performed by county merit systems civil service employees. A county adult protective service agency may utilize a contracted private or nonprofit telephone answering service after normal working hours and on weekends and holidays. Such a contracted telephone service shall immediately forward to a county merit systems civil service employee any report of abuse or neglect of an elder or dependent adult, unless the caller is: (a) requesting routine information only; (b) reporting an incident of abuse which occurred prior to the date of the call, which does not at the time of the call put the victim at risk; or (c) requesting information not related to the adult protective service program, and the person answering the telephone meets the standards established by the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 147, Sec. 36.   Effective July 22, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

15767.

(a) The department, in consultation with representatives from the County Welfare Directors Association of California, the California Elder Justice Coalition, and other relevant stakeholders, shall convene a workgroup to develop recommendations to create or establish a statewide adult protective services case management or data warehouse system. The recommendations shall include identification of potential outcome measures and other data elements that can be tracked and made publicly available for purposes of program planning.

(b) (1) The department shall submit recommendations developed pursuant to subdivision (a) to the Legislature by November 1, 2022.

(2) A report to be submitted pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 85, Sec. 71.   (AB 135)   Effective July 16, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

15768.

(a) The department shall select and award grants to private nonprofit or public entities for the purpose of establishing a statewide multipurpose adult protective services workforce development and training program in accordance with this section.

(b) The purpose of the workforce development and training program is to develop and implement statewide coordinated training and workforce development activities designed specifically to meet the needs of county adult protective services social workers assigned to provide intake and intervention services to elderly and dependent adults who may be subjected to neglect, abuse, or exploitation, or who are unable to protect their own interest. In addition, the program shall provide training for persons
 defined as mandated reporters pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 15630) of Chapter 11. The program shall provide the services required in this section to the extent possible within the total allocation. If allocations are insufficient, the department, in consultation with the County Welfare Directors Association of California, shall prioritize the efforts of the program, giving primary attention to the most urgently needed services.

(c) The workforce development and training activities provided pursuant to this section shall include initial and ongoing training for social workers, supervisors, and managers related to the provision of investigation and case management services outlined in subdivision (d) of Section 15763.

(d) The workforce development and training activities provided pursuant to this section shall include content specific to nationally recognized
 competencies for adult protective services, and shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(1) Core training for adult protective services social workers.

(2) Ongoing and advanced training for adult protective services social workers.

(3) Core, ongoing, and advanced training for adult protective services supervisors.

(4) Core, ongoing, and advanced training for adult protective services managers.

(5) Training and support for Master or Bachelor of Social Work students to receive specialized curricula aimed at increasing their competence in working with elderly and dependent adults in adult protective services settings.

(e) To the extent that funding is appropriated by the Legislature or provided through other sources, the department may enter into agreements with other public or private entities for the provision of workforce development and training activities for individuals, other than those working in the adult protective services program, who are serving victims of elder and dependent adult abuse and neglect. This includes, but is not limited to, individuals working in the offices of public administrators, public guardians, or public conservators.

(f) Implementation of this section is subject to an appropriation of sufficient funding from state or federal sources for the purpose of this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 50, Sec. 68.   (SB 187)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 14. Home Safe Program [15770. - 15771.]

15770.

For purposes of this chapter, the following definitions shall apply:

(a) “Adult protective services” means any of the following:

(1) The same meaning as defined in Section 15610.10.

(2) Activities performed, in accordance with tribal law or custom, on behalf of older adults and dependent adults who have come to the attention of a tribe, or tribal entity or agency, due to potential abuse or neglect.

(b) “Dependent adult” has the same meaning as defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 15750.

(c) “Older adult” means any of the following:

(1) The same meaning as “elder,” as defined in paragraph (2) of
 subdivision (b) of Section 15750.

(2) For individuals receiving services from a tribe, or tribal entity or agency, any person residing in this state within the age range established by tribal law or custom for tribal programs serving needy and vulnerable older adults. 

(d) “Eligible individual” means an individual who, at a minimum, meets all of the following conditions:

(1) Is an adult protective services client, is in the process of intake to adult protective services, or is an individual who may be served through a tribe, or tribal entity or agency, who appears to be eligible for adult protective services.

(2) Is homeless or at imminent risk of homelessness as a result of elder or dependent abuse, neglect, self-neglect, or financial exploitation, as determined by the adult protective services agency or tribal agency.

(3) Voluntarily agrees to participate in the program.

(e) “Homeless or at risk of homelessness” means any of the following:

(1) A person who lacks a fixed or regular nighttime residence and either of the following apply:

(A) The person has a primary nighttime residence that is a supervised publicly or privately operated shelter, hotel, or motel, designed to provide temporary living accommodations.

(B) The person resides in a public or private place not designed for, or ordinarily used as, a regular sleeping accommodation for human beings.

(2) A person who is in receipt of a judgment for eviction, as ordered by the court.

(3) A person who has received a pay rent or quit notice or who will otherwise imminently lose their primary nighttime residence, which may include individuals who have not yet received an eviction notice, if all of the following are true:

(A) The right or permission to occupy their current housing or living situation will be, or there is credible evidence that it will be, terminated within 21 days after the date of application for assistance.

(B) A subsequent residence has not been identified or secured, including, but not limited to, an individual exiting a medical facility, long-term care facility, prison, or jail.

(C) The individual lacks the resources or support network, including, but not limited to, family, friends, or faith-based or other social network, needed to obtain other permanent housing.

(4) A person who has a primary nighttime residence or living situation that is either directly associated with a substantiated report of abuse, neglect, or financial exploitation or that poses an imminent health and safety risk, and the person lacks the resources or support network needed to obtain other permanent housing.

(f) “Multidisciplinary personnel team” has the same meaning as defined in Section 15610.55.

(g) “Permanent housing” means a place to live without a predetermined limit on the length of stay subject to landlord-tenant laws pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 1940) of Title 5 of Part 4 of Division 3 of the Civil Code.

(h) “Primary nighttime residence or living situation” includes housing that an individual owns, rents, lives in without paying rent, or is sharing with others, or rooms in hotels or motels used as temporary shelter.

(i) “Program” means the Home Safe Program established pursuant to this chapter.

(j) “Supportive housing” has the same meaning as defined in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 50675.14 of the Health and Safety Code, except that the program is not restricted to serving only projects with five or more units.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 43, Sec. 69.   (AB 120)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

15771.

(a) Subject to an appropriation of funds for this purpose in the annual Budget Act, the department shall award grants to counties, tribes, or groups of counties or tribes, that provide services to older adults and dependent adults who experience abuse, neglect, self-neglect, or exploitation and otherwise meet the eligibility criteria for adult protective services, for the purpose of providing housing-related supports to eligible individuals.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), this section does not create an entitlement to housing-related assistance, which is to be provided at the discretion of the grantee as a service to eligible individuals.

(c) (1) It is the intent of the
 Legislature that housing-related assistance provided pursuant to this chapter utilize evidence-based practices in homeless assistance and prevention, including housing risk screening and assessments, housing first, rapid rehousing, and supportive housing.

(2) Housing-related supports and services available to participating individuals may include, but are not limited to, all of the following:

(A) An assessment of each individual’s housing needs, including a plan to assist the individual in meeting those needs, consistent with the case plan, as developed by the adult protective services agency. To the extent feasible, the plan shall be developed in coordination with a multidisciplinary team that may include housing program providers, mental health providers, local law enforcement, legal assistance providers, and others as deemed relevant by the adult protective services agency.

(B) Navigation or search assistance to recruit landlords and assist individuals in locating affordable or subsidized housing.

(C) Enhanced case management, including motivational interviewing and trauma-informed care, to help the individual recover from elder abuse, neglect, or financial exploitation.

(D) Housing-related financial assistance, including rental assistance, security deposit assistance, utility payments, moving cost assistance, and interim housing assistance while housing navigators are actively seeking permanent housing options for the individual.

(E) Housing stabilization services, including ongoing landlord engagement, case management, public systems assistance, legal services, tenant education, eviction protection, credit repair
 assistance, life skills training, heavy cleaning, and conflict mediation with landlords, neighbors, and families.
